Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 135C.40, subsection 1, paragraph d, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) The department shall establish and maintain a process to review each deficient practice identified by the department for which a citation may be issued to a nursing facility for immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of care prior to issuance of final findings under section 135C.40A . Representatives of the nursing facility issued such a citation may participate in the review to provide context and or evidence for the department to consider in determining if a final finding of immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of House File 309, p. 2 care should be issued. The review shall ensure consistent and accurate application of federal and state inspection protocols and defined regulatory standards. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 309, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor